Colorado statutes. TITLE 44 Revenue - Regulation of Activities
PART 1 MOTOR VEHICLE DEALERS
44-20-131. Right of action for loss.

If a person suffers loss or damage by reason of fraud practiced on the person by a licensed dealer or one of the dealer's salespersons acting on the dealer's behalf or within the scope of the employment of the salesperson, or if a person suffers any loss or damage by reason of the violation by the dealer or salesperson of any provision of this part 1 related to fraud that is designated by the board by rule, whether or not the violation is the basis for denial, suspension, or revocation of a license, the person suffering loss or damages has a right of action against the dealer or the dealer's motor vehicle salespersons. The right of a person to recover for loss or damage as provided in this subsection (1) against the dealer or salesperson is not limited to the amount of their respective bonds.

A person suffering loss or damages has a right of action against a licensed business disposer if:

The loss or damage is caused by fraud practiced on the person by the disposer or the disposer's agent within the scope of employment; or

The loss or damage is caused by the disposer violating any provision of this part 1 related to fraud and the violation is designated by the board by rule, whether or not the violation is the basis for denial, suspension, or revocation of the license.

If any person suffers any loss or damage by reason of any unlawful act as provided in section 44-20-124 (1)(a), the person shall have a right of action against the manufacturer, distributor, or manufacturer representative. In any court action wherein a manufacturer, distributor, or manufacturer representative has been found liable in damages to any person under this part 1, the amount of damages so determined shall be trebled and shall be recoverable by the person so damaged. Any person so damaged shall also be entitled to recover reasonable attorney fees as part of his or her damages.

If any licensee suffers any loss or damage because of a violation of section 44-20-124 (1), the licensee shall have a right of action against the manufacturer, distributor, or manufacturer representative. In any court action wherein a manufacturer, distributor, or manufacturer representative has been found liable in damages to any licensee under this part 1, any licensee so damaged shall also be entitled to recover reasonable attorney fees and costs as part of his or her damages.

A person who suffers loss or damages resulting from fraud may bring a separate action against, and recover from the surety on the bond of, the licensed dealer, business disposer, buyer agent, or salesperson if:

The licensed dealer, disposer, buyer agent, or salesperson has not reimbursed the person for the loss or damages; and

After either:

The board issued a final agency order with a finding of fraud by a licensed dealer, disposer, buyer agent, or salesperson; or

A court entered judgment upon a claim of fraud by a licensed dealer, disposer, buyer agent, or salesperson.

Source:

L. 2018:

Entire article added with relocations, (SB 18-030), ch. 7, p. 85, § 2, effective October 1.

L. 2019:

(1) amended, (SB 19-249), ch. 309, p. 2806, § 11, effective August 2.

L. 2020:

(1) amended and (4) added, (SB 20-140), ch. 225, p. 1104, § 4, effective September 14.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-6-122 as it existed prior to 2018.

44-20-132. Contract disputes - venue - choice of law.

In the event of a dispute between a motor vehicle dealer and a manufacturer under a franchise agreement, notwithstanding any provision of the agreement to the contrary:

At the option of the motor vehicle dealer, venue shall be proper in the county or judicial district where the dealer resides or has its principal place of business; and

Colorado law shall govern, both substantively and procedurally.

Source:

L. 2018:

Entire article added with relocations, (SB 18-030), ch. 7, p. 86, § 2, effective October 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-6-122.5 as it existed prior to 2018.

44-20-133. Disposition of fees - auto dealers license fund - created.

The department shall deposit all money received under this part 1 with the state treasurer, subject to section 24-35-101, together with a detailed statement of the receipts, and the money deposited with the state treasurer constitutes a fund to be known as the auto dealers license fund, which fund is hereby created; except that the department shall deposit fines imposed under sections 44-20-129 and 44-20-130 (2) in accordance with sections 44-20-129 and 44-20-130 (2). The fund shall be used under the direction of the board in the following manner:

For the payment of the expenses of the administration of the board as the general assembly deems necessary by making an appropriation therefor on an annual fiscal-year basis commencing July 1, 1971, and thereafter.

Any money remaining in the fund on December 31, 1971, and at the close of each calendar year thereafter, after costs of administration of the law as provided in this part 1, shall remain in the auto dealers license fund to be used for educational and enforcement purposes as appropriated by the general assembly.

To pay the department for the administration of actions or proceedings brought before the executive director pursuant to section 44-20-124;

To enforce section 44-20-124 (2);

To implement part 4 of this article 20;

To enforce section 44-20-423 (2).

Source:

L. 2018:

IP(1) amended and (1)(d) and (1)(e) added, (HB 18-1105), ch. 28, p. 328, § 1, effective August 8; entire article added with relocations, (SB 18-030), ch. 7, p. 86, § 2, effective October 1.

44-20-134. Advertisement - inclusion of dealer name.

A motor vehicle dealer or used motor vehicle dealer or any agent of the dealers shall not advertise any offer for the sale, lease, or purchase of a motor vehicle or a used motor vehicle that creates the false impression that the vehicle is being offered by a private party or by a buyer's agent or that does not contain the name of the dealer or the word "dealer" or, if the name is contained in the offer and does not clearly reflect that the business is a dealer, both the name of the dealer and the word "dealer".

Source:

L. 2018:

Entire article added with relocations, (SB 18-030), ch. 7, p. 86, § 2, effective October 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-6-125 as it existed prior to 2018.

44-20-135. Audit reimbursement limitations - dealer claims.

A manufacturer, distributor, or manufacturer representative shall have the right to audit warranty, sales, or incentive claims of a motor vehicle dealer for nine months after the date the claim was submitted.

A manufacturer, distributor, or manufacturer representative shall not require documentation for warranty, sales, or incentive claims or audit warranty, sales, or incentive claims of a motor vehicle dealer more than fifteen months after the date the claim was submitted, nor shall the manufacturer require a charge back, reimbursement, or credit against a future transaction arising out of an audit or request for documentation arising more than nine months after the date the claim was submitted.

The motor vehicle dealer shall have nine months after making a sale or providing service to submit warranty, sales, or incentive claims to the manufacturer, distributor, or manufacturer representative.

Subsection (1) of this section shall not limit any action for fraud instituted in a court of competent jurisdiction.

A motor vehicle dealer may request a determination from the executive director, within thirty days, that a charge back, reimbursement, or credit required violates subsection (1) of this section. If a determination is requested within the thirty-day period, then the charge back, reimbursement, or credit shall be stayed pending the decision of the executive director. If the executive director determines after a hearing that the charge back, reimbursement, or credit violates subsection (1) of this section, the charge back, reimbursement, or credit shall be void.

Source:

L. 2018:

Entire article added with relocations, (SB 18-030), ch. 7, p. 87, § 2, effective October 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-6-126 as it existed prior to 2018.

44-20-136. Reimbursement for right of first refusal.

A manufacturer or distributor shall pay reasonable attorney fees, not to exceed the usual and customary fees charged for the transfer of a franchise, and reasonable expenses that are incurred by the proposed owner or transferee before the manufacturer or distributor exercised its right of first refusal in negotiating and implementing the contract for the proposed change of ownership or the transfer of assets. Payment of attorney fees and expenses is not required if the claimant has failed to submit an accounting of attorney fees and expenses within twenty days after the receipt of the manufacturer's or dealer's written request for an accounting. An expense accounting may be requested by the manufacturer or distributor before exercising its right of first refusal.

Source:

L. 2018:

Entire article added with relocations, (SB 18-030), ch. 7, p. 87, § 2, effective October 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-6-127 as it existed prior to 2018.

44-20-137. Payout exemption to execution.

A motor vehicle dealer's right to receive payments from a manufacturer or distributor required by section 44-20-124 (1)(l) and (1)(r) is not liable to attachment or execution and may not otherwise be seized, taken, appropriated, or applied in a legal or equitable process or by operation of law to pay the debts or liabilities of the manufacturer or distributor. This section shall not prohibit a secured creditor from exercising rights accrued pursuant to a security agreement if the right arose as a result of the manufacturer or distributor voluntarily creating a security interest before paying existing debts or liabilities of the manufacturer or distributor. This section shall not prohibit a manufacturer or distributor from withholding a portion of the payments necessary to cover an amount of money owed to the manufacturer or distributor as an offset to the payments if the manufacturer or distributor provides the motor vehicle dealer written notice thereof.

Source:

L. 2018:

Entire article added with relocations, (SB 18-030), ch. 7, p. 87, § 2, effective October 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-6-128 as it existed prior to 2018.

44-20-138. Site control extinguishes.

If a manufacturer, distributor, or manufacturer representative has terminated, eliminated, or not renewed a franchise agreement containing a site control provision, the motor vehicle dealer may void a site control provision of a franchise agreement by returning any money the dealer has accepted in exchange for site control prorated by the time remaining before the agreement expires over the time period between the agreement being signed and the agreement expiring. This section does not apply if the termination, elimination, or nonrenewal is for just cause in accordance with section 44-20-124 (1)(d).

Source:

L. 2018:

Entire article added with relocations, (SB 18-030), ch. 7, p. 88, § 2, effective October 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-6-129 as it existed prior to 2018.

44-20-139. Modification voidable.

If a manufacturer, distributor, or manufacturer representative fails to comply with section 44-20-124 (1)(w)(II), the motor vehicle dealer may void the modification or replacement of the franchise agreement.

Source:

L. 2018:

Entire article added with relocations, (SB 18-030), ch. 7, p. 88, § 2, effective October 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-6-130 as it existed prior to 2018.

44-20-140. Termination appeal.

A motor vehicle dealer who has reason to believe that a manufacturer, distributor, or manufacturer representative has violated section 44-20-124 (1)(d) or (1)(w) may appeal to the board by filing a complaint with:

The executive director; or

A district court if neither the executive director nor the administrative law judge, appointed in accordance with this section, holds a hearing concerning the complaint within sixty days after the complaint was filed.

Upon filing of a verified complaint alleging with specific facts that a violation has occurred under this section, the termination, elimination, modification, or nonrenewal of the franchise agreement is automatically stayed, without the motor vehicle dealer posting a bond, until a final determination is made on each issue raised in the complaint; except that the executive director, administrative law judge, or court may cancel the stay upon finding that the cancellation, termination, or nonrenewal of the franchise agreement was for any of the reasons specified in section 44-20-124 (1)(d)(III). The automatic stay maintains all rights under the franchise agreement until the final determination of the issues raised in the verified complaint. The manufacturer, distributor, or manufacturer representative shall not name a replacement motor vehicle dealer for the market or location until a final order is entered.

If a verified complaint is filed with the executive director, the executive director shall refer the complaint to an administrative law judge with the office of administrative courts for final agency action.

In resolving a termination complaint, the manufacturer, distributor, or manufacturer representative has the burden of proving any claim made that the factors listed in section 44-20-124 (1)(d)(II) apply to the termination, cancellation, or nonrenewal.

The prevailing party in a claim that a termination, cancellation, or nonrenewal violates section 44-20-124 (1)(d) or (1)(w) is entitled to recover attorney fees and costs, including expert witness fees, incurred in the termination protest.

Source:

L. 2018:

Entire article added with relocations, (SB 18-030), ch. 7, p. 88, § 2, effective October 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-6-131 as it existed prior to 2018.

44-20-141. Stop-sale directives - used motor vehicles - definitions.

As used in this section, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Average trade-in value" means the value of a used motor vehicle as established by a generally accepted, published, third-party used vehicle resource.

"Stop-sale directive" means an unconditional directive from a manufacturer or distributor to a motor vehicle dealer to stop selling a type of motor vehicle manufactured by the manufacturer or distributed by the distributor because of a safety defect.

A manufacturer or distributor shall reimburse a motor vehicle dealer in accordance with subsection (3) of this section if:

The manufacturer or distributor issues a stop-sale directive for a motor vehicle manufactured or distributed by the issuer of the stop-sale directive;

The motor vehicle dealer holds an active sales, service, and parts agreement with the manufacturer or distributor for the line-make of the used motor vehicle covered by the stop-sale directive;

The used motor vehicle covered by the stop-sale directive is held in the inventory of the motor vehicle dealer on the date the stop-sale directive is issued or taken by the dealer as a trade-in vehicle on a consumer purchase of the same line-make; and

The manufacturer or distributor has not provided a remedy procedure or made parts available to repair the used motor vehicle for more than thirty days after the stop-sale directive is issued.

If the conditions in subsection (2) of this section are met, the manufacturer or distributor shall, upon application by the motor vehicle dealer, pay or credit the dealer one and one-half percent per month of the average trade-in value of the used motor vehicle's model prorated from thirty days after the stop-sale directive was issued to the earlier of:

The date when the manufacturer or distributor provides the motor vehicle dealer with a remedy procedure and any necessary parts for ordering to repair the used motor vehicle; or

The date the motor vehicle dealer transfers the motor vehicle.

A manufacturer or distributor may determine a reasonable manner and method required for a motor vehicle dealer to demonstrate the inventory status of a used motor vehicle to determine eligibility for reimbursement.

This section applies only to used motor vehicles.

This section is not intended to prevent a manufacturer or distributor from requiring that a motor vehicle not be subject to an open recall or stop-sale directive for the motor vehicle to be qualified or sold as a certified preowned vehicle or substantially similar designation.

This section does not require a manufacturer or distributor to provide total compensation to a motor vehicle dealer that would exceed the total average trade-in valuation of the affected used motor vehicle.

This section does not preclude a motor vehicle dealer and a manufacturer or distributor from agreeing to reimbursement terms that differ from those specified in this section.

Compensation provided to a motor vehicle dealer under this section is exclusive and may not be combined with any other remedy under state or federal law.

Source:

L. 2018:

Entire article added with relocations, (SB 18-030), ch. 7, p. 89, § 2, effective October 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-6-132 as it existed prior to 2018.

44-20-141.5. Fulfillment and compensation for warranty and recall obligations - definitions.

As used in this section:

"Manufacturer" includes a manufacturer, a distributor, and a manufacturer representative.

"Nonwarranty repair" means a diagnosis, repair, labor, or part for which payment was made by a person other than a manufacturer and that was not a warranty obligation. "Nonwarranty repair" also means customer-pay repairs, labor, or parts.

"Part" means an accessory, a part, or a component used to repair a motor vehicle. "Part" includes engine and transmission parts and all motor vehicle assemblies.

"Repair" means diagnosing, work, and labor performed by a motor vehicle dealer for which the motor vehicle dealer is making a claim for compensation.

"Retail labor rate" means the rate for labor calculated by the motor vehicle dealer in accordance with subsection (4) of this section that a manufacturer is required to pay a motor vehicle dealer in accordance with subsection (2) of this section.

"Retail parts markup percentage" means the percentage markup on parts calculated by the motor vehicle dealer in accordance with subsection (4) of this section that a manufacturer is required to pay a motor vehicle dealer in accordance with subsection (2) of this section.

"Warranty obligation" means diagnosing and repairing a motor vehicle in accordance with any warranty, recall, or certified preowned warranty, under which a manufacturer makes a repair commitment to a consumer or motor vehicle dealer.

At a motor vehicle dealer's request, a manufacturer shall timely compensate the motor vehicle dealer at the retail labor rate and the retail parts markup percentage in accordance with subsection (3) of this section for all labor performed and parts used by the motor vehicle dealer for covered repairs performed in accordance with the warranty obligation, if the retail labor rate and retail parts markup percentage are reasonably consistent with the requirements of this section that concern the retail labor rate and parts markup percentage.

A motor vehicle dealer may establish the retail labor rate and the retail parts markup percentage by submitting to the manufacturer either of the following as decided by the motor vehicle dealer:

One hundred sequential repair orders containing nonwarranty repairs, which may include a nonwarranty repair that is included in a repair order with a warranty obligation repair, that have been paid by a consumer and closed by the time of submission; or

All repair orders for nonwarranty repairs, which may include a nonwarranty repair that is included in a repair order with a warranty obligation repair, that have been paid by a consumer and closed by the time of submission for a period of ninety consecutive days.

A manufacturer shall not disqualify a repair order under this subsection (3) because the repair order contains both warranty and nonwarranty repairs, but only nonwarranty repairs are used in the calculation of the retail labor rate and the retail parts markup percentage.

A motor vehicle dealer may submit one set of repair orders for the purpose of calculating both its retail labor rate and the retail parts markup percentage or may submit separate sets of repair orders for purposes of calculating only its retail labor rate or for purposes of calculating only its retail parts markup percentage. If the rates from the calculation are ten percent higher or lower than the current rates, the manufacturer may request additional repair orders for the ninety days before or after the submitted repair orders for purposes of alteration.

Except with regard to a request for additional repair orders as provided in subsection (3)(c) of this section, the repair orders submitted under this subsection (3) to determine the retail labor rate must contain only repair orders from the last ninety days before the date the submission is sent to the manufacturer.

Except with regard to a request for additional repair orders as provided in subsection (3)(c) of this section, the repair orders submitted under this subsection (3) to determine the retail parts markup percentage must contain only repair orders from the last ninety days before the date the submission is sent to the manufacturer.

Except as provided in subsection (4)(c) of this section, to calculate the retail labor rate, the motor vehicle dealer must divide the motor vehicle dealer's total nonwarranty labor sales generated from the nonwarranty repairs submitted under subsection (3) of this section by the total number of labor hours that generated those total labor sales.

Except as provided in subsection (4)(c) of this section, to calculate the retail parts markup percentage, the motor vehicle dealer must divide the motor vehicle dealer's total parts sales generated from nonwarranty repairs submitted under subsection (3) of this section by the amount of the motor vehicle dealer's total cost for those parts, subtracting one from this amount, and then multiplying the amount by one hundred.

The calculation of the retail labor rate in subsection (4)(a) of this section and of the retail parts markup percentage in subsection (4)(b) of this section do not include parts used or labor performed:

For manufacturer or motor vehicle dealer special events, one-time specials, express service, and quoted-price promotional discounts, but this exclusion from the calculation does not include broadly applicable discounts offered by the dealer, such as percentage-off coupons, that apply to repairs and parts;

For parts sold at wholesale;

For routine maintenance, including replacement fluids, filters, batteries, bulbs, nuts, bolts, fasteners, tires, and belts;

That do not have individual part numbers;

For the repairs of a motor vehicle owned by the motor vehicle dealer, an affiliate of the motor vehicle dealer, or an employee of either the motor vehicle dealer or the affiliate;

For motor vehicle dealer reconditioning;

For window tint, protective film, masking products, or window replacement labor;

For manufacturer-approved and -reimbursed goodwill repairs or replacements;

For emission inspections required by law;

For safety inspections required by law;

For which a volume discount was negotiated with a third-party payer, including government agencies, insurance carriers, and fleet operators, but not including third-party warranty companies or service contract companies.

Notwithstanding any manufacturer requirement, policy, procedure, guideline, or standard, a motor vehicle dealer may submit to the manufacturer the retail labor rate or retail parts markup percentage as each is calculated in accordance with subsection (4) of this section.

A motor vehicle dealer may request in writing, not more often than once annually, an increase in compensation for labor at the retail labor rate for warranty obligations.

A motor vehicle dealer may request in writing, not more often than once annually, an increase in compensation for parts at the retail parts markup percentage for warranty obligations.

A manufacturer may conduct a periodic review of a motor vehicle dealer's service records to verify the continuing accuracy of the retail labor rate or retail parts markup percentage proposed by or in effect for the dealer.

A manufacturer shall not conduct a periodic review more than once per calendar year. This periodic review is not an audit in accordance with section 44-20-135.

If the submitted calculation of the retail labor rate or retail parts markup percentage is materially inaccurate or is substantially different than the rate of or percentage of other similarly situated same line-make dealers within the state, a manufacturer may contest the motor vehicle dealer's submitted calculations of the retail labor rate or retail parts markup percentage by delivering a notice to the motor vehicle dealer within forty-five days after receiving the submission in accordance with subsection (3) of this section from the motor vehicle dealer. To comply with this subsection (6), the notice must:
(6) (a) (I) If the submitted calculation of the retail labor rate or retail parts markup percentage is materially inaccurate or is substantially different than the rate of or percentage of other similarly situated same line-make dealers within the state, a manufacturer may contest the motor vehicle dealer's submitted calculations of the retail labor rate or retail parts markup percentage by delivering a notice to the motor vehicle dealer within forty-five days after receiving the submission in accordance with subsection (3) of this section from the motor vehicle dealer. To comply with this subsection (6), the notice must:

Include an explanation of the reasons that the manufacturer believes the calculation is subject to contest;

Provide evidence substantiating the manufacturer's position; and

Propose an adjustment of the contested retail labor rate or retail parts markup percentage.

Upon the discovery of new relevant information by the manufacturer, the manufacturer may modify the grounds for contesting the retail labor rate or retail parts markup percentage after delivering the notice to the motor vehicle dealer under this subsection (6), but the modification does not change the timing requirements in this section.

If the manufacturer does not timely contest the motor vehicle dealer's calculation of the retail labor rate or retail parts markup percentage in accordance with this subsection (6), the uncontested retail labor rate or retail parts markup percentage becomes effective forty-five days after the manufacturer has received the submission from the motor vehicle dealer, and thereafter, the manufacturer shall use the motor vehicle dealer's increased retail labor rate and retail parts markup percentage in calculating compensation for warranty obligations until a subsequent calculation of the motor vehicle dealer's retail labor rate or retail parts markup percentage is established in accordance with this section.

If the manufacturer timely contests the motor vehicle dealer's calculation of the retail labor rate or retail parts markup percentage and the manufacturer and motor vehicle dealer are unable to resolve the disagreement, the motor vehicle dealer may seek a determination by filing a complaint with a court of competent jurisdiction or the executive director no later than sixty days after the new motor vehicle dealer receives the manufacturer's challenge to the determined retail labor rate or retail parts markup percentage.

In a court proceeding, the court shall determine, in accordance with this section, the proper retail labor rate or retail parts markup percentage.

Any retail labor rate or retail parts markup percentage established through the proceeding applies retroactively to calculate reimbursement for any labor and part beginning thirty days after the manufacturer received the submission required by subsection (3) of this section.

If the manufacturer contests the motor vehicle dealer's calculation of the retail labor rate or retail parts markup percentage, the manufacturer shall continue to reimburse the motor vehicle dealer for warranty obligation repairs at the retail labor rate and retail parts markup percentage as both existed before the motor vehicle dealer submitted a request for an increase under subsection (5) of this section. When the manufacturer and motor vehicle dealer agree on the retail labor rate or retail parts markup percentage, the manufacturer shall pay any difference between the amount the manufacturer compensated the dealer and the amount agreed to by the motor vehicle dealer and manufacturer as of thirty days after the manufacturer received the submission required by subsection (3) of this section.

In the court proceeding, the court shall award the prevailing party reasonable attorney fees and costs. If the motor vehicle dealer prevails, the court shall award as damages the full amount of reimbursement that should have been paid to the motor vehicle dealer.

When calculating the retail labor rate and the retail parts markup percentage, the manufacturer:

Shall not establish an unreasonable flat-rate time, nor establish unreasonable flat-rate labor times for new line-makes that are inconsistent with the existing rates;

Shall, if the manufacturer furnishes a part to a motor vehicle dealer at no cost for use in performing a repair under a warranty obligation, compensate the motor vehicle dealer for the authorized repair part by paying the dealer an amount equal to the retail parts markup percentage multiplied by the cost the dealer would have paid for the authorized part as listed in the manufacturer's price schedule;

Shall not establish a different part number for repairs made in accordance with a warranty obligation than the part number established for nonwarranty repairs solely to provide a lower compensation to a motor vehicle dealer;

Shall not recover or attempt to recover, directly or indirectly, in whole or in part, any of its costs from the motor vehicle dealer for compensating the motor vehicle dealer under this section;

Shall not, directly or indirectly, in whole or in part, assess penalties or surcharges to the motor vehicle dealer, limit allocation of motor vehicles or parts to the motor vehicle dealer, or take any adverse action based on the motor vehicle dealer's exercise of the dealer's rights under this section;

Shall not require from a motor vehicle dealer any information that is unduly burdensome or time consuming to obtain, including any part-by-part or transaction-by-transaction calculations.

Nothing in this section prohibits a manufacturer from increasing the price of a motor vehicle or motor vehicle part in the normal course of business.

This section does not apply to any of the following that are involved in the manufacturing of or selling of recreational vehicles:

A motor vehicle dealer;

A manufacturer or component manufacturer;

A distributor; or

A manufacturer representative.

Source:

L. 2018:

Entire section added, (SB 18-219), ch. 330, p. 1974, § 2, effective October 1.

Editor's note:

This section was numbered as § 12-6-132.5 in SB 18-219. That section was harmonized with SB 18-030 and relocated to this section.

44-20-141.6. Fulfillment of warranty and recall obligations - recreational vehicles - definitions.

Definitions. As used in this section:

"Dealer" means a person licensed or required to be licensed as a motor vehicle dealer that sells recreational vehicles.

"Recreational vehicle" means the category of vehicle primarily designed as temporary living quarters for recreational, camping, or travel use, which either has its own motive power or is mounted on or drawn by another vehicle.

"Warrantor" means a person that gives a warranty in connection with a new recreational vehicle or parts, accessories, or components of a recreational vehicle. The term does not include a person who offers or performs service contracts, insurance, or extended warranties sold for separate consideration by a person who is not:

The manufacturer, distributor, or manufacturer representative; or

Controlled by a manufacturer, distributor, or manufacturer representative.

Warranty obligations of recreational vehicle warrantors. Each warrantor shall:

Compensate the dealer for warranty service, including diagnostic work;

Provide the dealer a schedule of compensation to be paid that must be in a flat-rate manual or other written guide;

Provide the dealer a schedule of the time allowances for warranty service that must provide adequate and reasonable time to complete service work and that must be in a flat-rate manual or other written guide;

Reimburse the dealer for warranty service and warranty parts in accordance with the schedule of compensation that is required in subsection (2)(b) of this section;

If the schedule of compensation required in subsection (2)(b) of this section does not include a particular repair, reimburse the dealer for warranty service for the actual time expended if reasonable, and the manufacturer bears the burden to prove that the actual time expended was unreasonable;

Reimburse the dealer for warranty service at not less than the lowest retail labor rate actually charged by the dealer for comparable nonwarranty labor if the rate is reasonable; and

Reimburse the dealer for warranty parts at wholesale price plus:

A minimum thirty percent handling charge; and

Any cost of freight to return warranty parts to the warrantor.

The warrantor shall not deny a dealer's claims for warranty compensation without cause, which may include performance of nonwarranty repairs, material noncompliance with the warrantor's published policies and procedures, lack of material documentation, fraud, or misrepresentation.

A warrantor shall not:

Fail to compensate a dealer for warranty repairs made to a recreational vehicle or component of a recreational vehicle made by the dealer of merchandise:

Damaged during delivery to the dealer or during manufacturing; or

Defectively built or designed;

Send replacement parts to a dealer at no charge without paying the parts markup required by subsection (2)(g) of this section times the dealer cost of the part;

Fail to fulfill parts orders when parts are available;

Retaliate against a dealer for exercising the dealer's rights under this section; or

Attempt to coerce a dealer to not exercise its rights under this section.

The dealer may submit warranty claims involving any component used in the manufacturing of a recreational vehicle to the manufacturer that:

Completes the manufacturing of the recreational vehicle; and

Issues the manufacturer's certificate of origin.

Notwithstanding the terms of any manufacturer and dealer agreement:

A warrantor shall indemnify and defend a dealer against any claim for or lawsuit for losses, liability, or damages, including defense costs and attorney fees, to the extent the loss, liability, or damage is caused by the negligence or willful misconduct of the warrantor or any component warrantor whose product is incorporated in the warrantor's product. The warrantor shall not deny the dealer indemnification or defense for failing to discover, disclose, or remedy a defect in the design or manufacturing of a recreational vehicle. To be indemnified or defended, the dealer must provide to the warrantor a copy of any claim in which allegations are made that fall under this subsection (6)(a) within ten days after receiving the claim or suit.

A dealer shall indemnify and defend its warrantor against any claim for or lawsuit for losses, liability, or damages to the extent the loss, liability, or damage is caused by the negligence or willful misconduct of the dealer independent of any manufacturing or design defect. To be indemnified or defended, the warrantor must provide to the dealer a copy of any claim in which allegations are made that fall under this subsection (6)(b) within ten days after receiving the claim or suit.

Dispute resolution for recreational dealers and manufacturers.

A dealer or warrantor injured by another party's violation of this section may bring a civil action in state court to recover actual damages. The court shall award attorney fees and costs to the prevailing party in the action. Venue for a civil action authorized by this section must exclusively be in the county where the dealer is located. In an action involving more than one dealer, venue may be in any county where a dealer who is party to the action is located.

To bring an action under this subsection (7):

A person must serve a written demand for mediation upon the alleged violator;

The demand for mediation must be served upon the alleged violator by certified mail at the address stated within the sales, service, and parts agreement between the parties unless subsection (7)(b)(I)(C) of this section applies to the action;

If a civil action is between two dealers, the demand must be mailed to the address on the dealer's license filed with the director;

The demand for mediation must contain a brief statement of the dispute and the relief sought by the party filing the demand.

Within twenty days after the demand for mediation is served, the parties shall mutually select an independent certified mediator and meet with the mediator for the purpose of attempting to resolve the dispute. The meeting place must be in this state in a location selected by the mediator. The mediator may extend the date of the meeting for good cause shown by either party or upon stipulation of both parties.

The service of a demand for mediation under this subsection (7) stays the time for the filing of an action under this subsection (7) until representatives of both parties have met with a mutually selected mediator to attempt to resolve the dispute. If an action is filed before that meeting, the court shall enter an order suspending the proceedings until the meeting has occurred and may, upon written stipulation of all parties to the proceeding that they wish to continue to mediate under this subsection (7), enter an order suspending the proceeding or action for as long a period as the court considers appropriate. A suspension order issued under this subsection (7)(b)(III) may be revoked by the court.

In mediation, the parties to the mediation bear their own costs for attorney fees and divide equally the cost of the mediator.

In addition to the remedies provided in this subsection (7) and notwithstanding the existence of any additional remedy at law, a dealer or manufacturer may apply to a state court for the grant, upon a hearing and for cause shown, of a temporary or permanent injunction restraining a person from violating or continuing to violate this section. The moving party need not post a bond for the injunction to be issued. Mediation is not required prior to seeking injunctive relief. A single act in violation of this section is sufficient to authorize the issuance of an injunction.

Source:

L. 2018:

Entire section added, (SB 18-219), ch. 330, p. 1980, § 3, effective October 1.

Editor's note:

This section was numbered as § 12-6-132.6 in SB 18-219. That section was harmonized with SB 18-030 and relocated to this section.